Georgia, session 2025_26, HB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "School Security Protection and Safety
Infrastructure Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 5 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to program weights and funding requirements under the "Quality Basic Education
H. B. 47
- 1 -

LC 56 0237
Act," is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-183, relating to program weights to reflect
funds for maintenance and operation of facilities, as follows:
"20-2-183.
(a) All program weights, when multiplied by the base amount, shall reflect sufficient funds
to provide for the maintenance and operation of facilities essential for housing instructional
programs and essential supportive educational services, subject to appropriation by the
General Assembly.
(b)(1) All program weights, when multiplied by the base amount, shall reflect sufficient
funds to provide funding assistance to reimburse eligible public schools for actual costs
incurred to reduce school violence and improve school safety and security. Such funds
may be referred to as school security protection and safety infrastructure funds.
(2) The State Board of Education shall annually determine the amount of state funds
needed to provide funding assistance to eligible public schools as set forth in paragraph
(1) of this subsection, subject to the following conditions:
(A) No public school shall be considered eligible for such funding assistance unless
such school complies with such policies, procedures, regulations, and other
requirements as adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to paragraph (3) of
this subsection; and
(B) Expenditures allowable under this subsection shall be limited to:
(i) Mobile surveillance camera trailers;
(ii) Onsite command centers;
(iii) Weapon detection technology for large events, daily campus entry, or any other
school function;
(iv) Systems designed to detect cigarettes, cigars, consumable vapor products, or
alternative nicotine products, as such terms are defined in Code Section 48-11-1; or
(v) Systems designed to detect marijuana as such term is defined in Code Section
16-13-21.
H. B. 47
- 2 -

LC 56 0237
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt policies, procedures, regulations, and other
such requirements as appropriate:
(A) To determine whether a public school is eligible for funding assistance under this
subsection;
(B) To establish procedures and requirements for public schools seeking funding
assistance under this subsection;
(C) To establish procedures for the Department of Education to evaluate requests by
public schools for funding assistance under this subsection;
(D) To calculate the maximum amount of funding assistance each eligible public
school is eligible to receive under this subsection, subject to appropriations by the
General Assembly;
(E) To annually assess whether and to what extent funding assistance provided to
eligible public schools under this subsection is having the intended impact of reducing
school violence or improving school safety and security; and
(F) As may be necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable beginning with the
2026-2027 school year and continuing each school year thereafter.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 47
- 3 -